<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88816-0111 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-16-88.f2.A1110</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 158 / Tuesday, August 16, 1988/ Notices<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Forest Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Recreation Residence Authorizations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Forest Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of adoption of final policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Forest Service hereby gives notice that it is adoptingcertain new policy and procedures for administering special use permitsthat authorize privately-owned recreation residences on National ForestSystem lands. When adopted, the policy will place in effect a new methodof calculating annual fees for recreation residences. It will also establishpolicy concerning the period of time authorized by the permit and determinationsconcerning the renewability of the permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>This policy is effective August 31, 1988. The15-day delay will allow distribution of the policy through the Agency'sinternal directive system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Questions about this policy shouldbe addressed to Ruben M. Williams, Lands Staff, Forest Service, USDA, P.O.Box 96090, Washington, DC 20090-6090, (202) 235-2253.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On January 2, 1987, the Forest Servicepublished a notice of proposed policy for the administration of recreationresidence permits (52 FR 206-218). The proposed policy recommended severalchanges in the current policy for administering recreation residences includinga proposal to calculate the annual fee by multiplying the base fee timesthe percent of change in the Implicit Price Deflator-Gross National Product(IPD-GNP). This new fee system would have become effective in 1987. Theproposal also called for establishment of a new base fee at 20-year intervals,issuing permits for a 20-year period with a provision for renewal at theend of the first 10-year period, involvement of permittee representativesin reviewing decisions appealed to Regional Foresters, and the review ofnonrenewal decisions 2 to 3 years prior to termination of the permit. Theproposal was developed by the Forest Service and a working group representingrecreation residence permittees, established at the request of the Chiefof the Forest Service.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Public Comment</ITAG>During the public comment period on this proposal, the Forest Supervisorof the Eldorado National Forest in California, issued the Highway 88 FutureRecreation Use Determination Draft Environmental Impact Statement (EIS).The preferred alternative in the draft EIS called for the removal of 82recreation residences located near the lakeshore of Silver Lake and atother locations. Materials about the Future Use Determination were mailedto permittees in other States by the Northern Sierra Summer Home Associationrequesting their support in opposing the proposed nonrenewal action. Manypeople apparently confused the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice on Recreation Residence policy with the<T4>Federal Register</T4> notice on the draft EIS. The Forest Supervisorwithdrew the draft EIS on April 2, 1987, because the policy on future usedeterminations was one of the major items being considered in the proposedrecreation residence policy and because of the confusion the draft EISwas creating. Any future action or study of the recreation residences inthe Eldorado and other National Forests will be consistent with the directioncontained in this final policy. Both the proposed policy and this finalpolicy provide greater protection to the permittees from nonrenewal oftheir recreation residence permits. In this policy, we have limited thepurposes for which recreation residence sites may be reclaimed by narrowingthe definition of higher priority use as it applies to recreation residencesites.To the extent possible, and based on the relative merit of the comments,the policy has been revised to respond to the comments and suggestionsreceived. In addition, the text has been changed to improve clarity andto conform to Forest Service directive system policy and standards wherenecessary.Several respondents questioned our notification procedures, i.e., directmailings to all recreation residence permittees and via the <T4>Federal Register</T4> to all others. Each permittee was mailed a copyof the notice of the proposed policy because the changes would directlyaffect them and the administration of their permits. The general publicwas notified of the proposed policy via the Federal Register because thismeans of public notice has widespread circulation and meets Federal legalnotice requirements.Independently, the National Forest Recreation Association mailed to allrecreation residence permittees a situation review position statement andoffered a questionnaire-style response form. Completed questionnaires representedabout 92 percent of the comments received on the proposed policy. The Forest Service received 3,188 responses on the proposed recreationresidence policy. The number and percentage of responses by category ofrespondent is as follows: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,s25,7,7 </C>  <H1>Respondent </H1><H1>Number </H1><H1>Percentage</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Permittee <D>3,072 </D><D>96.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Permittee Family Member or Friends <D>21 </D><D>0.7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Permittee Association <D>17 </D><D>0.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Others <D>56 </D><D>1.7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Forest Service Personnel <D>22 </D><D>0.7</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total </ITAG><D>3,188 </D><D>100.0</D></ITAG> All of the comments received have been reviewed and given considerationin reaching the final decision. The summary of comments have been organizedby topic and the Forest Service response to these topics follows. 1. <T3>Base Fees and Indexing. </T3>The Agency proposed to use establishedfees that became effective during the years 1978-1982 as the basis fora 20-year fee cycle using changes in the overall Implicit Price Deflator(IPD) for annual adjustments. Base fees would be updated to 1987 by applyingthe IPD adjustments. About 81 percent of the reviewers supported the 20-year fee cycle and adjustmentof the base fee by using the IPD. Other reviewers suggested such changesas: (1) No indexing of fees; (2) using an index that reflects Regionalor State differences; (3) using a base period prior to 1978; (4) startingthe indexing in 1987 or a year after the base fee year was established;(5) using the reduced fee resulting from the Appropriations Acts of 1983-1986as the fee base; or (6) preparing new appraisals using current market salesto establish a base fee. All of these proposals were considered in thedevelopment of the proposed and final policy, and all of them, except thelast one, would have the effect of reducing the fee that would become effectiveupon adoption of this policy. Establishing new base fees based on currentappraisals would result in increased fees, but we do not believe it wouldbe cost effective at this time. The proposed method of adjusting fees for the years up to and including1987 is unchanged in the final policy; however, we have clarified thatthe index is the Implicit Price Deflator-Gross National Product (IPD-GNP).In the proposed policy we used the term ``overall Implicit Price Deflator.''For the years 1988 and thereafter to the end of the fee cycle, the feeswill be adjusted by applying the percentage change in the index for thesecond quarter of the previous year to the second quarter of the currentyear to the current fees. For example, the percentage change in the indexfrom June 1986 to June 1987 gives the factor to apply to the 1987 feesto obtain the 1988 fees. Originally, the Forest Service and the Chief's permittee working grouphad proposed a 4-year phase-in of the 1987 fee increase. In the administrativereview of the proposal, the phase-in period was limited to 3 years. Thischange in the phase-in period was identified in the response form mailedto permittees by the NFRA. Almost all of the permittee respondents askedthat the phase-in period be 4 years rather than 3 years. Other respondents favored no phase-in of fee increases stating that thephase-in of fee increases adds to the Forest Service administrative costand reduces receipts to the Federal Government. Among the comments wereconcerns that the proposed phase-in of fee increases was more generousthan the previous policy which provided for the phase-in of fee increaseswhen the amount of the increase is $75 or more. Some questioned why theForest Service was proposing a different policy for the phase-in of recreationresidence fee increases from the phase-in policy for linear rights-of-waypublished in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on December 5, 1986, noting that only the amountof the fee increase in excess of $100 or 100 percent of the previous feecould be phased-in. We recognize that a significant number of permits will have fee increasesof less than $100 and a few of less than $20. We also recognize that thephase-in of fees adds marginally to our administrative costs and reducesreceipts to the Federal Government. These facts were recognized and consideredwhen the Forest Service was meeting with the permittee working group attemptingto reach an equitable solution to the fee controversy. We continue to believethat it is important to consider the fee issue as a whole. The overallpolicy change will significantly increase the fees that have been chargedsince 1983. At that time, the Congress enacted legislation that statutorilylimited fee increases and required the Forest Service to grant fee creditsfor fees paid in previous years that exceeded the statutory limits. Underthe final policy, we will restore the fees that were charged prior to 1983and adjust the base fee by the IPD-GNP index to arrive at the 1987 fee.Only the fee increase resulting from the adjustment of the base fee willbe phased-in. The base fee amount will not be phased-in, it will be restored.Likewise, annual fee adjustments for 1988 and fee adjustments that mayoccur in later years will not be phased-in. The new fee schedule will apply to permits for which the fees have alreadybeen paid for 1987 and 1988. A supplementary billing will be sent to permitteesfor the additional amounts owed under the new fee schedules for those years(see Implementation section). Finally, in mid-1986 we assured the Congress that we had reached agreement,subject to approval within the Administration, with the permittee workinggroup on the fee issue. On this basis, we requested, and the CongressionalAppropriations Committees agreed, that no provisions be embodied in the1987 Appropriation Act that would limit fees for 1987, as had been thecase in each Appropriation Act since 1983, should the new policy be implementedin 1987. A similar request was made, and agreed to, for the 1988 AppropriationAct. The phase-in of fee increases over a 4-year period was in the agreementreached with the permittee working group. Given the overwhelming supportof the reviewers for the 4-year phase-in, rather than the 3-year periodin the proposed policy, the final policy provides for a 4-year phase-inof the 1987 fee increase. While we will not limit the phase-in of fee increases to a dollar or percentageamount, we have, as in our proposed policy, provided for the phase-in offees for only those permittees who accept new recreation residence permits.The new recreation residence permits contain a provision for the annualadjustment of the fee amount by the percentage of change in the IPD-GNPindex. Fee increases will not be phased-in for those permittees who retaintheir old permits which provides only for adjustment of the fee at 5-yearintervals (Implementation section). <T3>2. Index Limitation. </T3>Most reviewers favored the 10 percent limitationon the increase or decrease in the fees resulting from the annual IPD adjustmentfor 1988 and thereafter. Some reviewers recommended no limitation, andothers recommended limitations ranging from 2 to 7 percent. We believethe 10 percent limitation is a reasonable level that protects both thepublic interest and the permittee and, therefore, it is not changed inthe final. 3. <T3>Appraisals and Fee Determination. </T3>The proposed policy providedthat the Forest Service would clarify and standardize instructions usedin appraising recreation residence sites to ensure common minimum standardsin the various appraisal tasks. Eighty-five percent of the commenters supportedthe proposed policy on appraisals. Some of the concerns expressed by thosenot agreeing dealt with appraisal procedures or process, such as constraintsof the special use permit on use of the residence, winter accessibility,and the possibility of nonrenewal. We have considered these limitationson use in developing detailed appraisal procedures and the standard appraisalcontract. Other commenters asked that we base the permit fee on the ForestService cost of administering the permits or valuations by local tax assessors.We considered these methods in developing the proposed policy, but didnot adopt them, because they would not result in fair market value fees,which the Agency is required by statute and OMB regulations to charge.Some respondents encouraged us to consider land leases where availablein our appraisals rather than lot sales. Others asked us to clarify whoselects and pays when a third appraisal is needed.In our market surveys we have found that recreation residence sites arealmost always sold in the private market rather than leased for constructionof a residence by an individual. Therefore, because of the scarcity ofsuch leases, we do not believe it would be practical to expend the moneyto search for such leases. Therefore, the final policy on appraisals andfee determinations is unchanged from the proposal. However, we have clarifiedthat the permittee and the Forest Service will share equally the cost ofa third appraisal.4. <T3>Annual Rental Rate. </T3>About 73 percent of the respondents favoredthe continuance of basing the annual rental on 5 percent of the appraisedsite value. Other reviewers asked that the rate be reduced for senior citizens,retirees, pensioners, veterans and other living on fixed income. We donot have statutory authority to discount the fee because of age or economicstatus of the permittee. The rate of 5 percent recognizes the various limitationson recreation residence use resulting from Federal ownership of the land.Therefore, the rate remains unchanged.5. <T3>Term Permit. </T3>Nearly 88 percent of the respondents favored revisionof the Term Permit Form and of the proposal to issue the permits for a20-year period with a provision to renew it at the end of 10 years, unlessthe Forest Service has identified a need to use the site for a higher publicpurpose. The Forest Service has worked with the permittee representativesin revision of the Term Permit. A copy of the new recreation residencepermit is included in the Forest Service Handbook 2709.11_Special Uses.6. <T3>Higher Public Purpose. </T3>We proposed that higher public purposefor future use determinations be defined as ``a higher priority use ofa site for the benefit of the general public that is timely, clearly needed,in public demand, and where other sites to satisfy the need cannot reasonablybe made available.''While most reviewers agreed with the proposed changes, several respondentsobjected to the proposed definition of higher public use and to the criteriafor not renewing recreation residence use. They felt that there are validreasons for not renewing recreation residence use of a site that couldnot be fully considered and evaluated using the proposed standards. Forexample, some believed that nonrenewal should be justified based on theneed for access to streams or lakeshores. There was a feeling that theForest Service under this proposal could only decide not to renew the residenceuse if the site was needed for development of public recreational facilitiesand no other alternative could be found.One reviewer raised the question of applicability of the higher publicpurpose criteria to recreation residences located in congressionally-designatedNational Recreation Areas and Wild and Scenic River corridors. The decisionon whether to allow recreation residences to remain in such congressionally-designatedareas will be handled in a manner consistent with the enabling legislation.It is recognized that the management purpose including visual managementconsiderations may be specifically identified in the legislation establishingthese special areas.We believe the definition of higher public purpose and the policies andguidelines for making renewal decisions are sufficiently flexible to allowthe Forest Service to recapture recreation residence sites needed for publicuse and management of the National Forests. The guidelines do not restrictthe Agency only to reclaiming sites where physical facilities are required.Therefore, the proposed definition is not changed in the final policy.7. <T3>Future Use Determinations. </T3>The proposed policy included specificguidelines for conducting studies to determine whether another use shouldbe made of recreation residence sites. Those guidelines emphasized theimportance of considering common, shared, or multiple-uses that integraterecreation residences with other uses of a site; the feasibility of usingother sites to meet the higher public purposes for the recreation residencesites; the potential recreational and financial losses of permittees andothers using their improvements as opposed to the benefits to the generalpublic to be gained by removal of the residences.Over 90 percent of the respondents agreed with the statement in the responseform prepared by the NFRA. That form said, ``Before deciding that recreationresidence sites will be converted to higher use, it is important to havean objective, fully explanatory description and analysis of the relevantdata needed to explore the reasonable alternatives. A separate study isneeded. It should be available to affected permittees. Specific guidelinesfor conducting it are necessary.''In addition, some respondents commented that permittee participation inthe future use determination process should result in a reduction of appeals.Another recommendation was to use a non-partisan arbitrator between theForest Service and permittees. The United States Statutes do not allowthe Forest Service to use arbitration for decisions regarding the use ofNational Forest lands.The Forest Service developed the term ``future use determination'' in themid-1960's when we had a number of recreation residence tracts under nonrenewalnotice or being studied for possible nonrenewal. At that time, we did nothave the environmental review and decision making process that came aboutpursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA). Now decisionson land uses, including special uses of National Forest lands, must bemade and documented in accordance with NEPA, and implementing regulations,policies, and procedures. We have concluded that the term ``future usedetermination'' is not needed and causes confusion among permittees andForest Service field people. For that reason, we have eliminated the term``future use determination'' from the final policy as well as the requirementto conduct a future use determination study prior to renewal of recreationresidence permits.Instead, renewal of recreation residence permits will be determined inthe same manner as other special use permit renewals. We will use NEPAprocedures in making decisions on the renewal of recreation residence permits.When proposed alternative uses for recreation residence sites that involvea higher public purpose are identified in a Forest Plan or in the NEPAscoping process for a project, the Forest officer will consider continuancein the analysis of alternatives for that proposed higher public use. Ifa Forest Plan or scoping for a project does not identify a need for a higherpublic use of the site, the permits will be renewed.The Forest Service will continue to provide a 10-year notice prior to thenonrenewal of a recreation residence as provided in the proposal. In thefinal policy, we have changed the term ``private recreation use permittee''to ``non-commercial recreation use permittee.'' The change in terminologyshould help remove some of the negative connotations associated with thelabel of an exclusive, private use of public lands. It will also help reinforcethe fact that a residence cannot be used or operated as a business. Wehave also emphasized that recreation residences are an important componentof the overall National Forest recreation program.8. <T3>In-Lieu Sites. </T3>We proposed to make a reasonable effort to provideother sites upon which permittees may build or relocate their improvementswhen not renewing a recreation residence permit for a higher public purpose.Most permittee respondents agreed with the proposal, and some asked thatthe offer of an in-lieu site be extended to owners of a recreation residencepermit who acquired the residence after a nonrenewal notice had been given.Other respondents opposed the offer of alternative sites for various reasons.Among the chief concerns was that the offer of in-lieu sites would leadto the permanent relocation of private recreation residences on the NationalForest that are available to only a very limited number of citizens ofthe United States. Another concern was the added cost to the Forest Serviceof offering in-lieu sites, such as planning, conducting environmental reviews,processing appeals, and adminstration of the sites. We agree that offeringin-lieu sites will add to the costs of administering the recreation residenceprogram and will help perpetuate recreation residences on the NationalForests. In the past 15 years there have been very few nonrenewal decisions.Based on this experience, we expect the cost of offering in-lieu sitesto be very low.In the final policy, we have clarified our intent to offer an in-lieu siteto an existing owner as well as to a new owner of a recreation residencethat is under nonrenewal notice.Recreation residences under nonrenewal are commonly sold to people whoattempt to use the facilities as their principal place of residence. Becausethe use of a recreation residence as a principal place of residence conflictswith the purpose for recreation residences and statutory authority, weare clarifying that an in-lieu site cannot be used as a principal placeof residence even though the existing residence site is used full time.Use of in-lieu sites must be consistent with the Forest Plan and must complywith State law and local government ordinances and zoning. Additionally,facilities developed on an in-lieu site must comply with Federal, State,and local building codes, and the holder will be required to pay any costs.9. <T3>Adjustment of Fees Upon Nonrenewal. </T3>The proposal to freeze a feeupon a decision not to renew a permit and to reduce the fee during thelast 10-year period was supported by nearly 86 percent of the reviewers.Some reviewers agreed to freezing the fee during the last 10-year period,but objected to reducing the fee. They questioned whether such fee reductionsmet the requirement to charge fair market value.We find the value of the recreation residence use is reduced during thelast few years prior to the nonrenewal of the residence use. The marketclearly shows that value declines when limitations are placed on use. Webelieve the fee reduction in the last 10 year period is fair and equitableand meets the requirement to charge fair market value fees. Therefore,we have in the final policy provided for reduction of the fee as proposed.Other reviewers asked that the fee reduction provision be granted to permitsunder life tenure. This would be inappropriate since the expiration datefor life tenure permits is unknown. To stay a fee increase or reduce thefee on an annual basis for permits under life tenure would deprive thepublic of a reasonable fee for exclusive use of Federal land.Rarely are life tenure provisions used in recreation residence permits.Where they have been used, the Forest Service would be willing, upon therequest of the permittee, to review the need for the termination and wherethere is a need to continue with the termination action, to issue a permitwith a fixed expiration date. The permittee would then qualify for a reducedfee. If there is no need to continue with the termination, a new 20-yearterm permit would be issued.As discussed in this policy, notice of nonrenewal of recreation residenceuse must be given at least 10 years prior to the expiration date. A longertime period may be given, and in the past up to 20 years advance noticewas given. Therefore, in order to be consistent in the fees charged permitsunder nonrenewal notice, we have clarified that the annual fee will befrozen on the tenth year prior to the scheduled expiration date ratherthan the date that the notice of nonrenewal is given.Having considered the comments received, the Agency adopts the proposedpolicy on adjustment of fees upon nonrenewal without change, except asnoted in the previous paragraph.10. <T3>New Recreation Residence Tracts. </T3>A number of respondents askedthe Forest Service to open new recreation residence tracts for development.They state that new sites when developed would provide more opportunityfor others to own and enjoy a residence in the National Forests. Some believethat it is an economical method to provide recreational opportunities onthe National Forests and would result in increased receipts to the ForestService and help reduce the Nation's deficit.In the mid-1960's, the Forest Service established a policy to discontinuethe designation and approval of new recreation residence tracts. By thattime, many private landowners had subdivided their properties for secondhome developments and there was no longer a need to use the National Forestfor second homes. Since that time, there has been an abundant supply ofsecond home lots that have similar or better amenities than lots that mightbe approved for recreation residences on the National Forest. There areapproximately 3 million second homes in the Nation and about 15,800 ofthese homes are recreation residences on the National Forest. Currently,there are several million lots on private lands that have not been developed.Therefore, the approval of additional recreation residence sites on theNational Forests could adversely impact the sale of lots for the secondhome market. For these reasons the Forest Service will continue its longstandingpolicy of not authorizing new tracts for recreation residence sites.11. <T3>Participation in Appeals. </T3>The proposal stated that the Agencywould work with permittee representatives who desire to participate inthe resolution of recreation residence issues appealed to the RegionalForester by other permittees. About 87 percent of the reviewers concurredwith the proposed policy and 674 permittees expressed an interest in workingwith permittee representatives and the Forest Service in the resolutionof issues. Other respondents objected to the proposal feeling that theForest Service would be making an alliance with a special interest groupthat can be perceived as giving the special interest an advantage overmembers of the general public and other special interest groups. Some questionedwhether the release of the information without the permittee's consentwould be a breach of the Privacy Act. Others noted that the Agency doesnot grant similar privileges to other special interest groups, who verywell may want to be informed and involved in the resolution of issues inwhich they have an interest.Our intent is to reach a fair and equitable resolution to permittee complaints,and we believe permittee representatives can assist the Forest Servicein this effort. We distinguish recreation residence permittees from otherinterest groups through the business relationship arising from the termpermit. Issues and complaints must necessarily be resolved within the contextof the terms of the permit. Since all permittees have the same permit,a decision relating to one permit could affect others.Where requested, the Agency will advise any individual permittee or permitteeorganization of issues related to administration of recreation residenceauthorizations for the purpose of reducing conflict between permitteesand the Forest Service. The proposal is adopted, but in response to concernabout breach of privacy, a clarifying statement has been added that noticeby the Forest Service will be given to permittee representatives or othersof an issue of concern to a permittee or an issue under appeal, unlessrequested otherwise by the permittee/appellant.12. <T3>Base Fee Reviews. </T3>We proposed to review certain base fees to ensurethat they are reflective of fair market value. In the proposal, we alsoinvited respondents to provide additional criteria or unusual appraisalsituations or problems. Less than 6 percent of the respondents expresseda problem with their base fee. Therefore, this provision is adopted asproposed. As a result, the Forest Service has reviewed or is presentlyreviewing.a. Permits where the 1978-1982 fee is currently under appeal and a decisionis to be made as required by the administrative appeal regulations (36CFR 211.18).b. Permits where appraisals were not conducted and used in establishingfees during the 1978-1982 period (in some cases, we may use an earlieror a later appraisal as the basis for the base fee that will be adjustedby the applicable IPD-GNP factor).c. Permits whose fees are not based on an appraisal.d. Permits in which the commenters questioned the appraisal values, exceptthat appraisals that have already been reviewed and resolved in the administrativeappeals process will not be reviewed.13. <T3>Review of Decisions Not to Renew Permits. </T3>We proposed to conductsupplemental or follow-up reviews of nonrenewal decisions prior to expirationof the permit to determine if circumstances have changed. Most reviewerswere agreeable to the proposal to review earlier nonrenewal decisions priorto the actual expiration date.Similarly, most reviewers agreed with the item in the National Forest RecreationAssociation response form that asked the Forest Service to review all decisionsfor permits that have expired, but the residences have not been removed.It should be noted that this was not included in our proposal. To requirea review of recreation residence permits that have already expired couldunnecessarily delay Forest Service development plans and schedules foran area.The Forest Service did agree to implement supplemental reviews of permitswith a nonrenewal notice provided the resulting decisions are non-appealable.On July 22, 1987, we published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> an Interim Rule that changed the administrativeappeal regulation at 36 CFR 211.18 to accomplish this. Upon adoption ofa final rule, we will require, as a matter of policy, that, upon requestof the holder, a review will be conducted 2 years prior to the establishedexpiration date of the permit for permits expiring in 1989 and thereafter.Forest Supervisors will notify affected permittees of the pending reviewand request their input.Regarding permits that are not being renewed after 1987 or 1988, the ForestService issued instructions to its field offices on July 17, 1987, directingForest Supervisors to notify all such permittees of their opportunity topetition the Forest Supervisor to review the earlier nonrenewal decision.The notice to the permittees made clear that any decision resulting fromthe review is excluded from appeal under the Administrative Appeal Regulation(36 CFR 211.18). The basis for this is the Interim Rule published in theFederal Register on July 22, 1987 (52 FR 27547).In reviewing nonrenewal decisions, the Forest Supervisor will determinewhether or not circumstances have changed since the original decision wasmade and if the reasons for nonrenewal are still valid. If the site isstill needed for a higher priority use, the permittee is to be promptlynotified. If the site is no longer needed for a higher priority use, anew 20-year term permit will be issued.14. <T3>Isolated Cabin Permits. </T3>The Agency proposed to work with permitteerepresentatives to identify and review any arbitrary and/or unfair actionin establishing nonrenewal dates for isolated cabins. We proposed conditionsunder which the reviews would be made. The NFRA permittee response formstated that, ``isolated cabins should not be removed only because theyare isolated. Removal of cabins that might otherwise qualify as recreationresidences should be based primarily on whether they are in conflict withhigher needs for the site.'' Most respondents agreed with the statement.Other respondents felt that cabins built on invalid mining claims, in trespass,and for other purposes to support a commercial operation, such as a sawmillor range allotment, should be removed so that the public could make useof the lands. They believe that a policy change that would allow thesecabins to be managed as recreation residences would give a windfall tothe current owners, would continue the private exclusive use of publiclands, and could encourage others to occupy National Forest lands withouta permit.One respondent pointed out that the Alaska National Interest Lands ConservationAct (16 U.S.C. 3210) provides specific direction for permitting and terminatingcabins in Alaska. We agree that cabins on National Forest lands in Alaskamust be administered in accordance with the ANILCA and that those cabinscannot be included under the general policy for administration of cabinpermits that applies to other National Forest System lands.The permittee working group believes that there are isolated cabin permitsthat should be allowed continued occupancy of National Forest lands. Whilethe Forest Service is willing to review individual situations, agreementhas not been reached as to the guidelines for identifying individual isolatedcabins that may qualify for recreation residence permits.The permittee working group and the Forest Service will continue to pursueidentification of isolated cabins which may qualify and standards for theirconversion to recreation residences or continuance under isolated cabinspolicies. Additional public comment on this subject will be requested ina future <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice.The Forest Service identified those isolated cabin occupancies that werescheduled for removal in 1987 and 1988. A joint review of these cases,and the attendant planned public involvement will provide insights intowhat standards may be used in determining which isolated cabin permitsshould appropriately be converted to recreation residence permits.Based on agreement with the permittee working group, isolated cabins inthe following categories will not qualify for conversion to recreationresidences:a. Cabins having been provided relief under the Mining Claim OccupancyAct (30 U.S.C. 701-708).b. Cabins built in trespass which can be resolved by the Small Tracts Act(16 U.S.C. 521c-521i).c. Cabins existing under a deed restriction in a Forest Service land acquisition.d. Situations where delay in removal would disrupt Forest Service developmentplans where funds are budgeted.e. If removal is by final court order or litigation.15. <T3>Compensation. </T3>Eighty-five percent of the respondents favored compensationwhen a permit is not renewed because the site is needed for a higher prioritypurpose. They want to be paid for the value of their improvements, costof moving to an in-lieu site, and cost of restoring the old site. However,not everyone agreed with the concept of compensation because the 10-yearnotice of nonrenewal with progressive fee reductions would already providepartial compensation for the permittee. Some felt that compensation shouldbe at a percentage that is less than the fair market value of the improvements.The NFRA permittee response form contained an inquiry as follows: ``Ifsuch compensation is not available, and if permittee-paid ``insurance''could be arranged to provide its equivalent, I would be willing to paythe following percentage of my fee (my annual fee is: $<T2>XXXXX</T2>)''.Approximately 43 percent of the respondents said they would be willingto pay a percentage of their fee in an insurance type of account for thispurpose.As stated in the January 2, 1987, <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice, the Forest Service does not have authorityto compensate permittees for the value of their improvements after a permithas expired. The Forest Service remains willing to work with permitteesin pursuit of alternative protection such as private insurance. We willcontinue to point out to holders that one of the risks of owning a recreationresidence on National Forest lands is that the permit may not be renewed.16. <T3>Transition. </T3>The Agency proposed to offer new 20-year term permitsafter approval of the final policy except in those cases where a nonrenewalnotice had been given or an analysis of the need for providing for higherpublic purposes was underway or was planned within 5 years. Almost allof the respondents agreed with the proposal. Therefore, permittees withunexpired terms on their permits must decide whether to immediately acceptnew term permits or wait until the existing permit term ends. The fee increaseeffective in 1987 will be phased-in over a 4-year period for those choosingto accept new permits. For permittees who keep their existing permits,the fee increase will not be phased-in. It is anticipated that most permitteeswho choose the new permit will receive a 20-year term permit. However,individual Forest Supervisors may elect not to grant a full 20-year termwhen nonrenewal is already established or must be considered within thenext 5 years.Following the analysis of public comment, the Forest Service continueddiscussions with the working group of recreation residence permittees forthe purpose of refining and clarfying the final policy. This continuedpermittee review and involvement combined with the Department's internalreview and clearance on this complex policy has resulted in a greater delayin adoption of the final policy then originally anticipated but has alsoproduced a policy that meets the Government's needs and most of permittees'concerns.<ITAG tagnum="84">Implementation</ITAG>The Forest Service plans the following actions and methods for implementingthis final policy:1. A new term permit has been developed, to be issued in Chapter 50 ofForest Service Handbook 2709.11, that will implement the changes in recreationresidence policy. Permittees will be offered an opportunity to converttheir existing permit to the new permit and will have 75 days to respondto the Forest Supervisor's notification (item 2) indicating their intention.2. Within 45 days of the effective date of this policy, Forest Supervisorswill provide each permittee the new permit including the length of termwhich will be granted and the revised fee.3. If the Forest Supervisor decides on a term of less than 20 years, thereasons for the shorter term will be stated. Except for permits on tenure,the term must be at least 10 years and cannot be less than the term remainingon the existing permit. If a term less than 20 years is necessary becausea recreation residence renewal study is underway or planned, the lengthof term granted should provide for time to complete the study plus at least10 years.4. For those permittees electing to retain their existing permit, feesfor 1987 will be determined by multiplying the cumulative IPD-GNP indexfor the number of years since the existing fee was established. For example,the 1987 fee for a permit with a fee of $300, established in 1979, wouldbe $456 ($300 times 1.52). In accordance with the terms of existing permits,the fee established for 1987 would remain constant until the end of the5-year fee adjustment period set forth in the permit. At the end of theadjustment period, the appropriate cumulative IPD-GNP index would be appliedto redetermine the fee. This methodology would continue until expirationof the term of existing permits, at which time the new standard term permitwould be issued, unless notice of nonrenewal has been given.5. For permittees electing to convert their existing permit to the newpermit, the fee will apply as of 1987. The fee charged in 1987 will bethe product of the base fee multiplied by the appropriate IPD-GNP index.(See Forest Service Handbook 2709.11_Special Uses, Chapter 30.) The amountof the fee increase will be phased-in over a 4-year period for these permitteesFees for 1988 will then be determined by applying the index to the 1987fees.6. Since permittees have already paid a partial fee for 1987 and 1988,a supplemental billing will be mailed to each permittee to collect theadditional fee owed for these two years. If the amount of the supplementalfee exceeds $100, Forest Supervisors will be authorized to collect thesupplemental fees for 1987 and 1988, if the holder desires, over a periodof time, not to exceed four months. Any credits due permittees resultingfrom the 1983-1986 Appropriation Acts provision will be applied to thesupplemental fee.7. This recreation residence policy will be issued as amendments to ForestService Manual (FSM) Chapters 2340 and 2720 and Forest Service Handbook(FSH) 2709.11, Special Uses. The revised policy for recreation residences,as it would appear in the Agency's directive system, is set forth at theconclusion of this notice.<ITAG tagnum="20">May 19, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">George M. Leonard,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Associate Chief.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Revised Recreation Residence Policy and Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T4>Note: </T4>The Forest Service uses alpha-numeric codes and subjectheadings to organize the text of direction. Only those sections of theForest Service Manual and Handbook that would be revised are set out here.Readers should keep in mind that the audience of this direction is ForestService employees charged with issuing and administering recreation residenceuse authorizations. The direction in FSH 2709.11, Chapters 30 and 40, willbe issued as Interim Directives and will be converted to the permanentdirection in 1 year. All other policy will be issued as final direction.)</ITAG>Title 2300_Recreation, Wilderness, and Related Resource Management<ITAG tagnum="81">2347_Non-Commercial Recreation Use</ITAG>This section deals with privately built and owned structures allowed onNational Forest land under special use authorization. These structuresare maintained for the use and enjoyment of holders and their guests. Asrecreation facilities, they are vacation sites and may not be used on apermanent basis (FSM 2721.23).<ITAG tagnum="81">2347.03_Policy</ITAG>1. Manage non-commercial recreation use sites in accordance with basicrecreation policy in FSM 2303 as important and valid components of theoverall National Forest recreation program.2. Maintain in place those existing facilities now occupying National Forestland under special use authorization that (a) are at locations where theneed for a higher public purpose has not been established, (b) do not constitutea material, uncorrectable offsite hazard to National Forest resources,and (c) do not endanger the health or safety of the holder or the public.3. Deny applications for construction of new facilities except where theywould replace similar existing facilities.4. Deny any proposal for commercial activity at permitted, non-commercialrecreation use sites.5. Require non-commercial recreation use holders to maintain their sitesto protect the natural forest environment. Do not allow construction orplacement of non-authorized facilities on these sites.<ITAG tagnum="81">2347.1_Recreation Residences (FSM 2721.23 and FSH 2709.11)</ITAG>1. Recreation residences are a very important use of National Forest Systemlands. They are an important component of the overall National Forest recreationprogram and have the potential of supporting a large number of recreationperson-days. The Forest Service will work in partnership with the holdersof these permits to maximize the recreational benefits of these residences.2. Administer recreation residence special use permits to ensure properuse of the site for family and guest recreation purposes.3. Use every reasonable effort to provide in-lieu sites to holders whohave received nonrenewal or termination notices (except termination forbreach). For this purpose, sites within or adjacent to the National Forestcontaining the residences being terminated or under nonrenewal, includingundeveloped or withdrawn sites, shall be available as in-lieu sites. Newtracts may be established for recreation residence in-lieu sites at locationsnot needed in the foreseeable future for a higher public use. In-lieu sitesshould be comparable to the sites being recovered when possible, but makesure that holders are informed that the Agency cannot guarantee that theavailable in-lieu sites will be entirely satisfactory. Do not establishnew recreation residence tracts for any other purpose than for providingin-lieu sites (FSM 2721.23e).4. Although a few full-time residences are currently authorized by specialuse permit, do not approve any new authorizations for such uses, exceptin special situations to provide caretaker or other similar services wherethere is a strongly demonstrated need (FSM 2347.12). Do not approve in-lieusites for full-time residence use.5. Issue 20-year term permits and renew them every 10 years unless needfor a higher public use at the same location has been documented and established.6. Give holders at least 10 years written advance notice if the use isnot to be continued, except when the permit is to be terminated when (a)it is in the public interest, particularly when the final decision authoritydoes not rest with the Forest Service, (b) there is an uncorrected breachof the permit, or (c) the site has been rendered unsafe by catastrophicevents such as flood, avalanche, or massive earth movement. In these exceptions,give as much advance notice as possible.7. Review nonrenewal decisions two years prior to the scheduled expirationdate to determine if the original decision is still valid, provided thedecision is non-appealable.8. Termination of a recreation residence permit within the term of thepermit should not be undertaken unless there are appropriations to payfor the improvements and there is an urgent need to use the site beforeit could be recaptured for public use by nonrenewal procedures. When consideringa termination, follow the procedures for permit renewals and nonrenewalsto the extent practical (FSH 2709.11, 41.23).<ITAG tagnum="81">2347.11_Preventing Unauthorized Residential Use</ITAG>Prevent unauthorized full-time residence use by enforcing the terms ofthe special use permit. Continue to administer those recreation residencespresently authorized as a principal place of residence in accordance withprovisions of the special use permit, under policy adopted in 1970. Upontransfer or sale of improvements, discontinue the residential use and authorizeonly recreation residence use.<ITAG tagnum="81">2347.12_Caretaker Residences </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">2347.12a_Authority </ITAG>Authorize caretaker use of a recreation residence with an annual permit,Form 2700-4, under the Act of June 4, 1897. (Require applicants who currentlyhave term permits to exchange them as a condition of obtaining the caretakerauthorization.) <ITAG tagnum="81">2347.12b_Caretaker Residence Use </ITAG>1. The Forest Supervisor may authorize caretaker residence in limited caseswhere it is demonstrated that caretaker services are needed for the securityof a recreation residence tract, and alternative security measures arenot feasible or reasonably available. The need for a caretaker residencerarely can be justified where yearlong occupancy is already authorizedin the tract. 2. Authorize no more than one caretaker residence per recreation residencetract unless factors such as size and layout of the tract call for morethan one. The affected tract association, or if there is no association,at least 60 percent of the affected holders, must document approval ofrequest for a caretaker residence. Require the applicants for caretakeruse to document the caretaker services they will provide. 3. Issue the annual permit only for an existing residence. The permit mustcontain a provision that automatically terminates authorization for yearlonguse in case of change in ownership. Do not authorize construction of anew residence for caretaker services. 4. Coordinate applications for caretaker residence permits with local Governmentalagencies to avoid creating unreasonable demands or burdens for such servicesas snow plowing, mail delivery, garbage pickup, school bus, or emergencyservices. 5. The fees for caretaker residences will be 25 percent more than thosecharged for recreation residence use of a similar site in the tract. 6. A tract association may own caretaker residences. 7. If a site ceases to be used as a caretaker residence, issue a new termpermit for recreation residence use to the holder, if qualified, or tothe purchaser of the improvements. Title 2700_Special Uses Management <ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23_Recreation Residence </ITAG>This designation incudes only those residences that occupy planned, approvedtracts or those groups established for recreation residence use (FSM 2347for basic policy on recreation residence use). <ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23a_Administration </ITAG>The following direction relates specifically to issuance and administrationof special use permits for recreation residence. For recreation residencepermits in Alaska, follow the additional requirements in Section 1303(d)of the Alaska National Interest Lands Conservation Act. 1. Issue special use permits for recreation residence in the name of oneindividual or to a husband and wife. Upon reissuance, renewal, or amendment,revise authorizations that are not issued to an individual or to a husbandand wife, so that the responsible person is identified. 2. Issue no more than one recreation residence special use permit to asingle family (husband, wife, and dependent children). 3. Do not issue special use permits for recreation residence use to entitiessuch as commercial enterprises, nonprofit organizations, business associations,corporations, partnerships, or other similar enterprises, except that atract association may own a caretaker residence. 4. To the extent possible, issue all recreation residence permits in atract, or in logical groups of tracts, with the same expiration date. 5. To help defray costs and provide additional recreation opportunities,a holder may obtain permission for incidental rental for specific periods.Ensure that rental use is solely for recreation purposes and does not changethe character of the area or use to a commercial nature. Rental arrangementsmust be in writing and approved in advance by the authorized officer. Theholder must remain responsible for compliance with the special use authorization.6. Allow no more than one dwelling per site to be built. In those caseswhere more than one dwelling (residence/sleeping cabin) currently occupiesa single site, allow the use to continue in accordance with the authorization.However, correct such deficiencies, if built without prior approval, upontransfer of ownership outside of the family (husband, wife and dependentchildren). 7. When a recreation residence is included in the settlement of an estate,issue a new special use permit, updated to reflect policy and proceduralchanges, to the properly determined heir, if eligible. Prior to estatesettlement, issue an annual renewable permit to the executor or administratorto identify responsibility for the use pending final settlement of theestate. When a recreation residence is sold, issue a new term permit tothe buyer, if eligible. 8. Specify in the permit that the recreation residence must be occupiedat least 15 days annually, the minimum acceptable period of occupancy.9. Issue recreation residence term permits for a maximum of 20 years. a. Term permits shall provide for renewal of 20-year permits 10 years beforeexpiration unless nonrenewal has been established. b. At the end of the first 10 years after initial issuance, offer holders,in writing, new 20-year term permits that also include the provision forrenewal at the end of 10 years, unless written notice of nonrenewal hasbeen given. c. Continue to renew term permits in this same manner unless holders aregiven notice of nonrenewal. 10. When a higher public need for the site has been documented and established(FSH 2709.11, Chapter 40), initiate nonrenewal action. a. Notify existing and prospective holders of the reasons, and providethem with copies of the documentation.b. Allow the current term permit to expire under its own terms, or issuea new term permit for between 10 and 20 years, depending on the time ofthe identified need.c. Clearly specify any limited tenure in the new permits with: ``This permitwill terminate on (<T3>insert date</T3>) and will not be renewed.''11. Recreation residences are a valid use of National Forest System landsand an important component of the total National Forest recreation program.Recreation residences may represent a substantial investment and have thepotential of supporting a large number of recreation person-days per acrecompared with other uses. Therefore, when considering nonrenewal of recreationresidence permits for an alternative use, be sure the clear weight of theevidence is on the side of the need for the higher public purpose or useat the location.12. Before approval by the Forest Supervisor, the Regional Forester willreview proposed nonrenewal notices, supporting documentation and summaryof public comments, and may modify them.13. In cases where a nonrenewal decision has been made and use beyond theexpiration date will be authorized for a limited period of time, issuea term permit for a corresponding period of time, not to exceed 20 years.14. The Forest Supervisor or Regional Forester may review nonrenewal decisionsat any time, using current Forest Service Manual and Forest Service Handbookpolicies and guidelines and considering any new or changed conditions.Forest Supervisors, upon request of the holder, shall review all such decisions2 years prior to the expiration date (FSH 2709.11, Sec. 41.23d), provideddecisions resulting from such review are non-appealable.15. In the event a recreation residence is destroyed or substantially damagedby a catastrophic event such as a flood, avalanche, or massive earth movement,conduct an environmental analysis to determine whether improvements onthe site can be safely occupied in the future under Federal and State lawsbefore issuing a permit to rebuild. Normally, the analysis should be completedwithin 6 months of such an event.Allow rebuilding if the site can be occupied safely. However, if the needfor a higher public use at the same location has been documented and established,do not allow rebuilding if the improvements are more than 50 percent destroyed.If rebuilding is not authorized, make every reasonable effort to offerin-lieu sites to holders.16. At the time special use permits are issued, advise holders that theymust notify the Forest Service if they intend to sell their improvements,and that they must provide a copy of the special use permit to a prospectivepurchaser before finalizing a sale. Whenever possible, advise a prospectivepurchaser of the terms and conditions of the special use permit beforethe sale is final.17. Usually, do not stay a fee increase pending completion of an appealof the fee under the administrative review regulations. Make any adjustmentsresulting from the administrative review through credit, refund, or supplementalbilling.18. During the term of the permit, termination of the use may only takeplace in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.Before approval by the Forest Supervisor, the Regional Forester will reviewproposed terminations (except termination for breach of terms of the permit),with supporting documentation and a summary of the public comments, andmay modify them.<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23b_Applications</ITAG>Insofar as practicable, notify a new or prospective owner that he or shemust make application for the authorization to use existing improvementsin accordance with 36 CFR 251.54.<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23c_Permit Preparation</ITAG>1. Use the Term Special Use Permit for Recreation Residence (FSH 2709.11,ch. 50), to authorize recreation residences, except use Form FS-2700-4,Special Use Permit, when:a. Extended use of a nonrenewed recreation residence is authorized anda minimum term of continued use cannot be predicted.b. Continuance of the recreation residence use is conditioned on the ownercomplying with specific Forest Service requirements before a term permitis issued.c. The improvements are managed by a third party pending settlement ofan estate, bankruptcy proceedings, or other legal action.d. Yearlong occupancy is authorized by the Forest Supervisor, at whichtime the improvement ceases to be a recreation residence.2. Include in either permit all authorized improvements associated withrecreation residence use; however, do not authorize use of more than thestatutory maximum of 5 acres under a term permit. Authorize community orassociation-owned improvements, such as water systems, by a separate permit(Form FS-2700-4).<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23d_Fee Determination (FSH 2709.11, ch. 30)</ITAG>1. Use fair market value as determined by appraisal in determining thebase annual rental fees for recreation residence sites. Redetermine thebase fee at 20-year intervals.2. Adjust the fee annually by the annual (second quarter to second quarter)change in the Implicit Price Deflator-Gross National Product (IPD-GNP).3. Use professional appraisal standards in appraising recreation residencesites for fee determination purposes (FSH 2709.11).4. Where feasible, contract with private fee appraisers to perform theappraisal.5. Require appraisers to coordinate the assignment closely with affectedholders by seeking advice, cooperation, and information from the holdersand local holder associations.6. Retain only qualified appraisers. To the extent feasible, use thoseappraisers most knowledgeable of market conditions within the local area.7. Before accepting any appraisal, conduct a full review of the appraisalto ensure the instructions have been followed and the assigned values aresupported properly.Forest Service Handbook 2709.11_Special Uses<ITAG tagnum="81">Chapter 30_Fee Determination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">33_Recreation Residence Fees</ITAG>33.1_<T3>Base Fees and Indexing.</T3> Follow these procedures in determiningthe base (beginning) fee and subsequent fees under a 20-year cycle.1. As the initial base, use the fees established in one of the years between1978 and 1982. The first year of the fee cycle will be the first year ofthe established fee (disregarding any phase-in that may have been provided).Adjust the full base fee forward by applying the appropriate cumulativeImplicit Price Deflator-Gross National Product (IPD-GNP) adjustment factorshown in Exhibit 1. New fees for 1989, established in this manner, willbe phased-in over a 4-year period (1989-1992) at the rate of one-fourthof the increase each year, except that fees will not be phased-in for thosepermits that limit fee adjustments to 5-year intervals.In those cases where there may not be a fee established for the 1978-1982period, Regional Foresters are authorized, subject to concurrence of theChief, to utilize a different starting date and to adjust the length ofthe fee cycle so that all permits will have a new base fee determined duringthe 1998-2002 period.2. For 1990 through the last year of the fee cycle, adjust the fees onan annual basis by calculating the percentage change of the IPD-GNP index(as reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis, Department of Commerce,in July of each year) from the second quarter of the previous year to thesecond quarter of the current year and applying this percentage adjustmentfactor to the current year's fees.For term permits that restrict adjustments to 5-year intervals, apply theIPD index adjustments cumulatively at 5-year intervals. At the end of thecurrent 20-year term, or earlier if agreed to by the holder, revise permitsto provide for annual indexing.3. Limit the annual fee adjustment for 1990 and thereafter to 10 percentper year when the change in the IPD-GNP index exceeds 10 percent in anyone year. The index amount in excess of 10 percent will be carried overand applied to the fee for the next succeeding year in which the indexfactor is less than 10 percent. The 10 percent limit shall not apply tothe fee adjustment (phased-in amount) for 1989.4. Re-appraise the site toward the end of the 20-year cycle. Beginningin the twenty-first year (the first year of the next fee cycle; 1998 inthe case of 1978 fees), put into effect the base fee for the next 20-yearcycle by applying 5 percent to the newly determined appraised market valueof the site for recreation residence purposes.5. In those few cases where one or more additional sleeping structures(guest cabins, and so forth) have been added to a single site, add to thecurrent adjusted base fee an additional charge equal to 25 percent of thefee established for a single residence use of the site or $100, whicheveris greater, per structure.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>13,L2,s50,8,8,8,8,8,8,8,8,8,8,8,8</C><T4>EXHIBIT 1_SEC. 33.1_IPD-GNP ADJUSTMENT FACTOR BY YEAR</T4><H1>Base fee year</H1><H1>1979</H1><H1>1980</H1><H1>1981</H1><H1>1982</H1><H1>1983</H1><H1>1984</H1><H1>1985</H1><H1>1986</H1><H1>1987</H1><H1>1988</H1><H1>1989</H1><H1>Cum. Adj.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1978<D>1.101</D><D>1.092</D><D>1.095</D><D>1.067</D><D>1.050</D><D>1.032</D><D>1.038</D><D>1.033</D><D>1.026</D><D>1.028</D><D>1.029</D><D>1.771</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1979<D/><D>1.092</D><D>1.095</D><D>1.067</D><D>1.050</D><D>1.032</D><D>1.038</D><D>1.033</D><D>1.026</D><D>1.028</D><D>1.029</D><D>1.609</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1980<D/><D/><D>1.095</D><D>1.067</D><D>1.050</D><D>1.032</D><D>1.038</D><D>1.033</D><D>1.026</D><D>1.028</D><D>1.029</D><D>1.473</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1981<D/><D/><D/><D>1.067</D><D>1.050</D><D>1.032</D><D>1.038</D><D>1.033</D><D>1.026</D><D>1.028</D><D>1.029</D><D>1.346</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1982<D/><D/><D/><D/><D>1.050</D><D>1.032</D><D>1.038</D><D>1.0233</D><D>1.026</D><D>1.028</D><D>1.029</D><D>1.261</D><F>(NOTE: Cum. Adj.=Cumulative Adjustment.)</F></ITAG></ITAG>The above factors for fee years 1979-1986 were taken from Table 5, PriceIndexes and the Gross National Product Implicit Price Deflator, as publishedin the <T3>Survey of Current Business</T3> by the Department of Commerce, Bureauof Economic Analysis, February 1986. These factors represent an annualrate, based on the percent change from the first quarter to the secondquarter of the indicated year. The 1987 factor of 1.026 is the percentagechange in the IPD-GNP index from the second quarter of 1985 to the secondquarter of 1986 as reported in the July 1986 issue of ``United States Departmentof Commerce News,'' a publication by the Bureau of Economic Analysis. TheIPD-GNP index for the second quarter of 1985 is 111.1. The 1988 and 1989factors, was determined following the same procedures, using the appropriateyear's publication. The factors for 1979-1989 in Exhibit 1 are shown onlyto illustrate how the cumulative adjustment factor used to establish the1989 fee is determined. The factor were determined by chain multiplyingthe factor for the years within the base fee year period (for 1982 thiswould be 1.050andmultiply;1.032andmultiply;1.038andmultiply;1.033andmultiply;1.026andmultiply;1.028andmultiply;1.029=1.261.)The following two examples illustrate use of this table in determiningthe 1989 fee:(1) A fee of $412 that became established in 1982 (first year in the feecycle) would be adjusted to $520 in 1989 ($412andmultiply;1.261). This wouldbe the fee amount owed by a holder who does not accept the new term permitand would remain constant until the end of the five year adjustment period.If a new term permit is accepted, the fee would be phased-in, and the holderwould be charged $439 for 1989, instead of the full amount.(2) A 1980 base year fee of $315 would be adjusted to $464 ($315andmultiply;1.473)with the actual 1989 charge limited to $352 for a new term permit. A holderwho keeps the old permit would pay the full fee of $464 in 1989.Factors for the years 1990 and thereafter will be determined in the samemanner as the 1980 factor. Using the 1989 factor as an example, the indexfor the second quarter of 1987 as reported in the July 1987 Bureau publicationis 117.2; the index for February 1988 in the July 1988 Bureau publicationis 120.6. The percentage change in the index to be used to determine 1989fees is 120.6 minus 117.2 divided by 117.2. Thus, 1989 fees will be 2.9percent higher than 1988 fees for those permits that are indexed.Using the above two examples, calculation of the 1990 fees for those acceptingnew term permits would be as follows:(A 1990 IPD-GNP adjustment factor of 1.028 is assumed.)(1) The full 1989 fee of $520 times the IPD-GNP index factor for 1990 of1.028 equals $535, the full fee for 1990. The increase in the fee is $15.The amount of the 1989 fee increase to be phased-in in 1990 is $54 ($520^$412=$108/2=$54).Thus, the 1990 fee to be charged is the base 1982 fee of $412+$54+$15=$484.(2) The full 1990 fee equals $477, a fee increase of $13. The amount ofthe 1989 fee increase to be phased-in in 1990 is $75 ($464^$315=$149/2=$75).Thus, the 1990 fee to be charged is the base 1980 fee of $315+$75+$13=$403.<T3>33.11_Fee Credits.</T3> Provide holders any unused or remaining creditsdue them under provisions of the Appropriations Acts for fiscal years 1983through 1986.<T3>33. 2_Fees on Nonrenewal.</T3> When permits are placed on tenure (thatis, the special use permit will not be renewed upon expiration), the annualfee for the tenth year prior to the expiration, referred to as the ``baseon-tenure fee,'' will be taken as a base and the fee for each year duringthe last ten years will be one-tenth of the base multiplied by the numberof years then remaining on the permit. For eample, charge a holder with9 years remaining 90 percent of the frozen fee; with 8 years, 80 percent;and so forth.Use the following schedule to calculate the holder's fee during the 10-yearperiod:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,8</C> <H1>Years remaining</H1><H1>Percent of base on-tenure fee</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">10<D>100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9<D>90</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8<D>80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7<D>70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6<D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5<D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4<D>40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3<D>30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2<D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1<D>10</D></ITAG></ITAG>Use the following fee determination procedures when a review of the nonrenewaldecision shows conditions have changed that warrant continuation of therecreation residence permit.1. If a new 20-year term permit is issued, the Forest Service shall recoverone-half of the sum of the amount of fees foregone while the previous permitwas under nonrenewal notice. Collect this amount evenly over a 10-yearperiod. The obligation will run with the site and be charged to a subsequentpurchaser.The new fee shall be the annual index adjusted fee computed as though nolimit on tenure existed, plus the amount specified above until paid infull.2. If a 20-year term permit is not issued, and the occupancy of the subjectsite is to be allowed to continue for less than 10 years, do not recoverpast fees. Determine the new fee by:a. Computation of the fee as if no nonrenewal notice was issued reducedby the appropriate percentage for the number of years of the extensionprovided (that is, a 6-year tenure period results in a fee equal to 60percent of the new base on-tenure fee).b. If a site is allowed to continue past a 10-year period and is returnedto a normal permit, the Forest Service shall recover fees as outlined initem 1, computed for the most recent 10-year period in which the term ofthe permit was limited.<T3>33.3</T3>_<T3>Appraisals.</T3> Use the following process to determine the fair marketvalue of recreation residence sites.1. Use appraisals made by professional appraisers for determining the marketvalue of the fee simple estate of the National Forest land underlying thesite subject to a special use permit, but without consideration as to howthe authorization would or could affect the fee title of the site (FSH5409.12, Chapter 6 for the standard contract to be used to establish fairmarket value of recreation residence sites).2. In consultation with affected holders, select and appraise typical sites(rather than all individual sites) within groups that have essentiallythe same or similar value characteristics. Within such groupings, adjustfor measurable differences between the sites. (Once properly established,typrical site classifications should rarely change.)3. Ensure appraised values are based on comparable market sales of sufficientquality and quantity that will result in the least amount of dollar adjustmentto make them reflective of the subject sites' characteristics. Such characteristicsinclude:a. Physical differences between subject site and the comparable sales.b. Legal constraints imposed upon the market by governmental agencies.c. Economic considerations evident in the local market.d. Locational considerations of subject site in relation to the market(sales) comparable.e. Functional usability and utility of the site.f. Amenities occurring to the site as compared with selected sales comparables.g. Availability of improvements (such as roads, water systems, and powerlines) provided by nonholder entities, including the United States. Donot adjust for improvements furnished by holders.h. Other market forces and factors identified as having a quantifiableeffect upon value.<T3>33.31_Appraisers._</T3>1. Select fee appraisers who hold a currentcertification of competence from a nationally recognized professional appraisalorganization. It the case of Forest Service appraisers, use those individualswho have received adequate training through professional appraisal organizationsand who have satisfactorily completed the basic courses necessary to demonstratecompetence.2. Require appraisers to sign a standard agreement that states:a. The approved appraisal format to be used.b. The approved standard forms to be used.c. A full, complete, and accurate definition of the appraisal problem.d. The standards of professional competence, ethics, and practice to whichthe appraiser shall adhere.e. Those requirements of the appraisal assignment that may be imposed under(1) statutes, (2) Federal regulations, (3) Forest Service policies, andprocedures, and (4) situations unique to the given appraisal assignment.3. Require appraisers to notify affected holders by mail and offer to meetwith them to discuss the assignment, answer questions specific to the assignment,and seek advice, information, and cooperation from the holders and theirlocal organization. The appraiser must notify holders of such a meetingat least 30 days in advance of the meeting. Send notices to the addressused for bills for collection. Use the notice to give the holders advanceinformation on the appraisal assignment. At such meetings, require thatthe appraiser have available copies of the appraisal instructions, directions,and requirements for review by the holders. An appraisal cannot be madeprior to the meeting with the holders.<T3>33.32_Establishing Recreation Residence Site Value.</T3> 1. Upon receiptof the appraisal report, conduct a review of the appraisal in conformancewith the standards of the National Association of Review Appraisers.2. Following review and acceptance of the appraisal, notify affected holdersof Forest Service acceptance of the report. In the notification, informholders that they and other interested parties have 45 days in which toreview the appraisal. Upon request, provide copies of the report(s) andsupporting documentation pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act.3. Upon request, provide an opportunity for affected holders to obtain,at their expense, an appraisal report from an appraiser holding at leastthe same or similar qualifications as the one selected by the Forest Service.a. The Forest Service will provide the holders with a copy of the standardsused by the appraiser selected by the Forest Service and holders will providethe standards to the holder-employed appraiser. The holder will requirethe observance of these standards, including a signed certification thatensures an understanding of the appraisal instructions and standards. Rejectany appraisals that do not meet these standards.b. Subject the holder-furnished appraisal to the same review requirementsas the appraisal obtained by the Forest Service.4. Give full and complete consideration to both appraisals. If the twoappraisals disagree in value by more than 10 percent, ask the two appraisersto try and reconcile or reduce their differences. If the appraisers cannotagree, the Forest Supervisor will utilize either or both appraisals todetermine the fee.5. When requested, seek a third appraisal.a. The cost shall be shared equally by the holder and the Forest Service.b. This appraisal must meet the same standards of the first and secondappraisals and may or may not be accepted by the authorized officer.Title 2700_Special Uses Management<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23e</ITAG>_Analysis of Recreation Residence Continuance (FSH 2709.11,ch. 40)Follow these instructions in determining whether recreation residence usemay continue at current sites or whether the sites should be convertedto a higher public use.1. Analyze and consider the future use needs of recreation residence sitesbefore renewing the authorizations for new terms. Before issuing a nonrenewaldecision, ensure that the action is fully supported by a report conductedwithin the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act and ForestService analysis process. If done as part of the Forest Plan, the reportwill be included as a separate appendix to the plan.2. Ensure that continuance of recreation residence uses conforms with theAct of March 4, 1915, authorizing issuance of term special use permitsfor summer homes.3. Base nonrenewal decisions on the extent of the need for higher publicuse of the site. Higher public use or purpose refers to a higher priorityuse of the site by the public that is timely, clearly needed, in publicdemand, and where other sites to satisfy the need cannot reasonably bemade available. In meeting public needs, give consideration to alternativessuch as (a) availability of sites other than recreation residence sitesto satisfy the public needs, (b) feasibility of common, shared, or multipleuses that include recreation residences, and (c) increased feasibilityof common or shared use through adjustment of site and tract size, configurationof boundaries, or location of improvements.4. Coordinate continuance of recreation residence use with decisions containedin the Forest Land and Resource Management Plan. When there is no readilyidentifiable higher public future use of the site and continued use isconsistent with the Forest Land Management Plan, a decision to renew mayqualify for categorical exclusion under NEPA procedures.5. When permits are not renewed at expiration, make every reasonable effortto offer holders alternative (in lieu) sites at locations not needed inthe foreseeable future for a higher public use (FSM 2347.1, and FSH 2709.11,sec. 41.23b and sec. 41.23d).6. In the event of a nonrenewal decision, give the holder at least 10 yearscontinued use and identify the specific higher public purpose(s) for whichthe land is being recovered. Allow continued use of the site until suchtime as conversion to the new use is ready to begin.7. Proposals to convey recreation residence tracts into private ownershipby land exchange may be considered at any time. Such proposals will beprocessed in accordance with the instructions in FSM 5430 applicable toall land exchanges.<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23f_Participation In Issue Resolution</ITAG>1. Give notice of any recreation residence issues and appeals that reachthe Regional Forester to holder representatives, and others that requestto be notified, unless requested otherwise by the appellant. This includesthe National Forest Recreation Association Homeowners Divison and NationalInholders Associations. The purpose is, on a regional basis, to providean opprtunity for the holder representatives to participate in order toreduce conflict between holders and the Forest Service. As necessary, specifya Forest Officer to work with the holder representatives and others.2. Consider information submitted by permittee representatives within thecontext of the Secretary of Agriculture's administrative appeal regulations.3. The reviewing officers may exercise their authority to extend time giventhe permittees and other parties a reasonable time to submit their information,not to exceed thirty (30) days.<ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23g_Noncompliance</ITAG>Give a written notice and provide a reasonable opportunity for a holderto correct special use permit violations before terminating the use forbreach or noncompliance. Termination for noncompliance shall be only fora breach that continues after notice and a reasonable opportunity for correctionhas been given. <ITAG tagnum="81">2721.23h_Site Restoration</ITAG>On termination or nonrenewal of the permit, require the holder to returnthe property to a condition acceptable to the Forest Supervisor. The holdermay release the improvements to the Forest Service upon approval of theForest Supervisor.Forest Service Handbook 2709.11_Special Uses <ITAG tagnum="81">Chapter 40_Special Uses Administration</ITAG><T3>41.23</T3>_<T3>Recreation Residence.</T3><T3>41.23a</T3>_<T3>Continuing Recreation Residence Use.</T3> (FSM 2721.23e). As with alltypes of special uses, decisions to issue new permits and/or decisionsnot to renew are appealable decisions which must be appropriately supportedunder the requirements of NEPA.1. In most cases, scoping will result in a finding that the sites are notneeded for higher public purpose within the next 20 years and a new 20year term permit can be issued. Such a finding will likely qualify forcategorical exclusion.2. If scoping indicates that there is firm and factual basis for believingthat there may be a future higher public purpose within 20 years, afterconsultation with the Regional Forester, conduct an environmental analysisto determine whether or not the sites should be recovered for higher publicpurposes and, if so, when. Such studies will begin with the understandingthat recreation residences are a valid use of National Forest lands unlessclearly demonstrated otherwise. (FSM 2721.23a). Site disturbance resultingfrom removal and relocation of the recreation residence plus impacts ofnew construction may dictate that an environment assessment or environmentalimpact statement will be necessary.3. Decisions to recover sites for a higher public use must be coordinatedwith the Forest plan but are to be in a self-contained form.4. If there is no reasonably foreseeable need for the recreation residencetract to be used for a higher public purpose, or if identified public needscan be met through land exchange, encourage and facilitate an exchangeof the sites (on a tract or group basis) for private lands suitable forNational Forest purposes.5. Where appropriate, require deed restrictions on National Forest landdisposals to ensure the recreation residence use continues in a mannercompatible with adjoining or nearby National Forest uses. <T3>41.23b</T3>_<T3>Minimum Analysis Requirements for Nonrenewal Actions</T3>_1. <T3>Report.</T3> When nonrenewal is anticipated or could be recommended,the environmental assessment and/or the environmental impact statementmust contain an objective and detailed description and analysis of allrelevant data, and any explanatory notes, charts, and maps needed to exploreall reasonable alternatives. The environmental analysis process must befollowed and there must be an action plan.During the analysis process, encourage and solicit information and commentsfrom permittees and other interested parties. Involve affected permitteesin all phases of the process except the decision itself. Provide them 120days or more encompassing a season of use to comment on a draft of theenvironmental assessment and/or the environmental impact statement andthe supporting documentation.To ensure Region-wide uniformity, submit the reports, if they recommendnonrenewal, including holder comments, to the Regional Forester for reviewbefore the Forest Supervisor approves the nonrenewal.Provide holders and interested parties with copies of the final reportand decision immediately after the decision date.Consider the following aspects in the report:a. <T3>Recreation Use.</T3> Discuss the relationship between the recreationresidence use and other present and proposed uses of the site. Thoroughlydescribe elements of compatibility and conflict. If there are current oranticipated conflicts, described the feasibility of other sites to meetpublic use needs or how general public needs on the site can be providedfor by modifying recreation residence or proposed public use. Develop afull range of alternatives that at a minimum:(1) Show ways to meet the public recreation needs without significant conflictwith recreation residence uses, if possible, and how existing or potentialconflicts can or cannot be mitigated.(2) Examine the feasibility of common, shared, or multiple use that includesthe recreation residences. Also examine the feasibility of adjusting siteand tract sizes, configurations and boundaries, or relocation of site improvementto better a accommodate such use.(3) Examine the feasibility of alternative sites for general public use.Include in this analysis suitable private lands that the Forest Servicecould acquire by land exchange. The presumption is that such alternativesites are available unless otherwise demonstrated.(4) Show how the current and/or future need for other planned recreationuses outweighs or is outweighed by the benefits of continued recreationresidence use.(5) Compare the potential recreation and financial losses to holders andtheir guests with the benefits that the public would gain from nonrenewalof the authorization.(6) Examine the impacts of recreation residence removal, new construction,and increased public use.b. <T3>Other Resources.</T3> Show in what way recreation residence occupancyis compatible or in conflict with other National Forest resources. Considerthe applicability of Section 106 of the National Historic PreservationAct and other Federal and State laws which may have an effect on theseresources.c. <T3>Environmental Impacts.</T3> Discuss the environmental impacts of continuedrecreation residence use, together with the impacts of any improvementsnecessary for their continued use, compared with the impacts of any proposedalternative public use.d. <T3>Health and Safety.</T3> Examine whether the occupancy constitutes ahazard to the health and safety of the general public or the holders. Explainspecifically how and in what manner these hazards will occur and the opportunitiesfor acceptable curative actions. Discuss whether health and safety standardscan be met.e. <T3>Administrative Problems.</T3> Explain if the occupancy creates untenableadministrative problems or costs when related to the benefits providedthe holders and the general public, including fees, cultural benefits,barriers to environmentally harmful use, and other amenities or servicesattributable to the presence of the holders and their improvements.f. <T3>In-Lieu Site Availability.</T3> Make every reasonable effort to locateand reserve in-lieu sites that could be offered the holder for buildingor relocation of improvements. Such sites must be nonconflicting locationswithin or adjacent to the National Forest containing the residences (FSM2347.1 and FSM 2721.23e). Appropriate alternatives for consideration areundeveloped or withdrawn sites in, near, or adjacent to established tracts,or new traces at locations not needed in the foreseeable future for a higherpublic use. Sites that are vacant because of breach or other factors shallbe available as in-lieu sites. Follow these procedures:(1) If possible, offer in-lieu sites to holders at the time the nonrenewalnotice is given. If sites do not become available until later, offer themthen.(2) Give first priority to identifying and offering in-lieu sites in thesame tract or an expansion of that tract, where feasible.(3) Allow the holders 90 days from the date of the joint inspection ofthe lieu site or 90 days from the final disposition of any appeals of thenonrenewal decision, whichever is later, to accept or reject the offer.(4) When holders accept such offers, reserve the offered sites. Do notcharge a fee until the holder begins improving the site. The site reservationwill expire upon holders failure to occupy the new site on a mutually-agreedupon schedule.(5) Allow holders accepting offers to continue use of their current sitesuntil the expiration date. Inform the holders that they should be preparedto move to the in-lieu site during the 24 months prior to the scheduledoccupancy removal, provided a supplemental review of the nonrenewal actionhas been completed.(6) The opportunity to develop an in-lieu site, if accepted by the previousowner, will be extended to the new owner when there is a change in ownershipof authorized improvements.(7) Do not offer alternative sites for termination actions stemming fromnoncompliance with special use permit terms.2. <T3>Factors To Consider In Nonrenewal Actions.</T3> Support nonrenewaldecisions by full consideration and documentation of the following specificfactors and criteria:a. The specific intended use or uses and the estimated time and budgetaryfeasibility of the need.b. The need for the alternative use and the reason for its priority.c. The reasons the public need cannot be met at an alternative location.d. All reasonable alternatives to the conversion, including the possibilityof combining or sharing public uses with recreation residence uses; andadjusting or altering lots or location of improvements to better accommodatecommon or shared uses.e. The reasons any conflict between the recreation residences and the proposedalternative use cannot be resolved.f. The need to develop and provide the public use needed in a cost effectivemanner.3. <T3>Higher Public Purpose.</T3> Identify and consider whether or not thereis clear need for higher priority use of the site that is of benefit tothe general public, is timely, in public demand, and where other sitesto satisfy the need cannot reasonably be made available. Need and timeliness,for example, can be demonstrated by capacity use of similar nearby facilities.Examples of higher public purposes include but are not limited to (1) publicroads and other public rights-of-way where no reasonable alternatives exist,(2) legally mandated public safety or health requirements, (3) other publicrecreation needs, (4) habitat requirements for rare or endangered species,and (5) commercial use developments serving National Forest programs, suchas authorized resort accommodations, where no reasonable public or privatealternatives exist. Determination of higher public purpose for commercialuse must show a clear and convincing need and bear a greater burden ofproof than those for other uses. Higher public purposes do not includeunspecified public needs or uses, such as general Forest use or open spacealone.<T3>41.23c_Nonrenewal Notification.</T3> Provide holders 10 years or moreadvance notice of nonrenewal actions except in cases involving breach,or when the site has been rendered legally unsafe by catastrophic eventssuch as avalanche, flooding, or massive earth movement, or where the ForestService does not have final decision authority. In these exceptions, makean effort to provide as much notice as possible.Include in a nonrenewal notice:1. A description of the action and the reasons for the decision. Normally,use the same expiration date for all affected holders in a particular groupor tract.2. Identification of the environmental assessment report or the environmentalimpact statement upon which the decision is based.3. Notice of appeal rights under 36 CFR 211.18.4. Notice that the holder should refrain from making costly repairs, improvements,or expenditures. Advise the holder that such expenditures will not be requiredunless they are necessary to protect public health or safety.Refer to FSM 2721.23a for procedure when recreation residences are destroyedor substantially destroyed by catastrophic events.<T3>41.23d_Review of Nonrenewal Actions.</T3> The Forest Supervisor orthe Regional Forester may review nonrenewal actions in process and shouldconsider such reviews when circumstances or Forest Service direction havechanged in such a manner that could suggest modification of the originaldecision (FSM 2721.23a).For permits scheduled to expire in 1989 or thereafter, Forest Supervisorswill review all such decisions two years prior to the non-renewal dateupon request of the holder to analyze possible new circumstances or direction,and to determine whether or not the basis for the decision is still valid,providing the decision resulting from such review is non-appealable.For all reviews, the following apply:1. Reviews will be in writing and conducted in accordance with FSM 2721.23e.2. Affected holders will be notified in writing and asked to provide inputfor reviews and will be allowed involvement in all but the decision phaseof the review process.3. If review indicates that a site will remain needed for higher publicuse at the established date, the earlier decision may remain unchanged.4. If review indicates that a site is no longer needed for higher publicpurposes, or is not needed as soon as estimated, provide for continuationof the recreation residence use by issuing a new permit for an appropriateterm.Forest Service Handbook 2701.11_Special Uses <ITAG tagnum="81">Chapter 50_Terms and Conditions</ITAG><T3>54_Special Use Authorizations</T3><T3>54.1_Term Special Use Permit for Recreation Residences. </T3>(Exhibit1.)<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-11-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 3 230</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-11-C</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Terms and Conditions</ITAG>I. Authority and use and Term AuthorizedA. This permit is issued under the authority of the Act of March 4, 1915,as amended (16 U.S.C. 497), and Title 36, Code of Federal Regulations,Sections 251.50-251.64. Implementing Forest Service policies are foundin the Forest Service Directives System (FSM 2720, 2340; FSH 2709.11, Chap.10-50). Copies of the applicable regulations and policies will be madeavailable to the holder at no charge upon request made to the office ofthe Forest Supervisor.B. The authorized officer under this permit is the Forest Supervisor, ora delegated subordinate officer.C. This permit authorizes only personal recreation use of a noncommercialnature by the holder, members of the holder's immediate family, and guests.Use of the permitted improvements as a principal place of residence isprohibited and shall be grounds for termination of this permit.D. Unless specifically provided as an added provision to this permit, thisauthorization is for site occupancy and does not provide for the furnishingof structures, road maintenance, water, fire protection, or any other suchservice by a Government agency, utility association, or individual.E. Expiration at End of Term: This authorization is for a term of 20 yearsand will expire on <T2>XXXXXXXXXX</T2>.II. Operation and MaintenanceA. The authorized officer, after consulting with the holder, will preparean operation and maintenance plan which shall be deemed a part of thispermit. The plan will be reviewed annually and updated as deemed necessaryby the authorized officer and will cover requirements for at least thefollowing subjects:1. Maintenance of vegetation, tree planting, and removal of dangerous treesand other unsafe conditions.2. Maintenance of the facilities.3. Size, placement and descriptions of signs.4. Removal of garbage or trash.5. Fire protection.6. Identification of the person responsible for implementing the provisionsof the plan, if other than the holder, and a list of names, addresses,and phone numbers of persons to contact in the event of an emergency.(Other provisions may be included, such as fencing, road maintenance, boatdocks, piers, boat launching ramp, water system, sewage system, incidentalrental, and the Tract Association).<ITAG tagnum="21">(Note: Regional Foresters may add specific provisions that ForestSupervisors should include in the plan.)</ITAG>III. ImprovementsA. Nothing in this permit shall be construed to imply permission to buildor maintain any improvement not specifically named on the face of thispermit or approved in writing by the authorized officer in the operationand maintenance plan. Improvements requiring specific approval shall include,but are not limited to: signs, fences, name plates, mailboxes, newspaperboxes, boathouses, docks, pipelines, antennas, and storage sheds.B. All plans for development, layout, construction, reconstruction or alterationof improvements on the site, as well as revisions of such plans, must beprepared by a licensed engineer, architect, and/or landscape architect(in those states in which such licensing is required) or other qualifiedindividual acceptable to the authorized officer. Such plans must be approvedby the authorized officer before the commencement of any work.IV. Responsibilities of HolderA. The holder, in exercising the privileges granted by this permit, shallcomply with all present and future regulations of the Secretary of Agricultureand all present and future federal, state, county, and minicipal laws,ordinances, or regulations which are applicable to the area or operationscovered by this permit. However, the Forest Service assumes no responsibilityfor enforcing laws, regulations, ordinances and the like which are underthe jurisdiction of other government bodies.B. The holder shall exercise diligence in preventing damage to the landand property of the United States. The holder shall abide by all restrictionson fires which may be in effect within the forest at any time and takeall resonable precautions to prevent and suppress forest fires. No materialshall be disposed of by burning in open fires during a closed fire seasonestablished by law or regulation without written permission from the authorizedofficer.C. The holder shall protect the scenic and esthetic values of the NationalForest System lands as far as possible consistent with the authorized use,during construction, operation, and maintenance of the improvements.D. No soil, trees, or other vegetation may be removed from the NationalForest System lands without prior permission from the authorized officer.Permission shall be granted specifically, or in the context of the operationsand maintenance plan for the permit.E. The holder shall maintain the improvements and premises to standardsof repair, orderliness, neatness, sanitation, and safety acceptable tothe authorized officer. The holder shall fully repair and bear the expensefor all damage, other than ordinary wear and tear, to National Forest lands,roads and trails caused by the holder's activities.F. The holder assumes all risk of loss to the improvements resulting fromacts of God or catastrophic events, including but not limited to, avalanches,rising waters, high winds, falling limbs or trees and other hazardous naturalevents. In the event the improvements authorized by this permit are destroyedor substantially damaged by acts of God or catastrophic events, the authorizedofficer will conduct an analysis to determine whether the improvementscan be safely occupied in the future and whether rebuilding should be allowed.The analysis will be provided to the holder within 6 months of the event.G. The holder has the responsibility of inspecting the site, authorizedrights-of-way, and adjoining areas for dangerous trees, hanging limbs,and other evidence of hazardous conditions which could affect the improvementsand or pose a risk of injury to individuals. After securing permissionfrom the authorized officer, the holder shall remove such hazards. H. In case of change of permanent address or change in ownership of therecreation residence, the holder shall immediately notify the authorizedofficer. V. LiabilitiesA. This permit is subject to all valid exising rights and claims outstandingin third parties. The United States is not liable to the holder for theexercise of any such right or claim. B. The holder shall hold harmless the United States from any liabilityfrom damage to life or property arising from the holder's occupancy oruse of National Forest lands under this permit. C. The holder shall be liable for any damage suffered by the United Statesresulting from or related to use of this permit, including damages to NationalForest resources and costs of fire suppression. Without limiting availablecivil and criminal remedies which may be available to the United States,all timber cut, destroyed, or injured without authorization shall be paidfor at stumpage rates which apply to the unauthorized cutting of timberin the state wherein the timber is located. VI. FeesA. Fee Requirement: This special use authorization shall require paymentin advance of an annual rental fee.B. Appraisals: 1. Appraisals to ascertain the fair market value of the site will be conductedby the Forest Service at least every 20 years. The next appraisal willbe implemented in <T2>XXXX </T2>(insert year). 2. Appraisals will be conducted and reviewed in a manner consistent withthe Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, from which theappraisal standards have been developed giving accurate and careful considerationto all market forces and factors which tend to influence the value of thesite. 3. If dissatisfied with an appraisal utilized by the Forest Service inascertaining the permit fee, the holder may employ another qualified appraiserat the holder's expense. The authorized officer will give full and completeconsideration to both appraisals provided the holder's appraisal meetsForest Service standards. If the two appraisals disagree in value by morethan 10 percent, the two appraisers will be asked to try and reconcileor reduce their differences. If the appraisers cannot agree, the AuthorizedOfficer will utilize either or both appraisals to determine the fee. Whenrequested by the holder, a third appraisal may be obtained with the costshared equally by the holder and the Forest Service. This third appraisalmust meet the same standards of the first and second appraisals and mayor may not be accepted by the authorized officer. C. Fee Determination: 1. The annual rental fee shall be determined by appraisal and other soundbusiness management principles. (36 CFR 251.57(a)). The fee shall be 5percent of the appraised fair market fee simple value of the site for recreationresidence use. Fees will be predicated on an appraisal of the site as a base value, andthat value will be adjusted in following years by utilizing the percentof change in the Implicit Price Deflator_Gross National Product (IPD-GNP)index as of the previous June 30. A fee from a prior year will be adjustedupward or downward, as the case may be, by the percentage change in theIPD-GNP, except that the maximum annual fee adjustment shall be 10 percentwhen the IPD-GNP index exceeds 10 percent in any one year with the amountin excess of 10 percent carried forward to the next succeeding year wherethe IPD-GNP index is less than 10 percent. The base rate from which thefee is adjusted will be changed with each new appraisal of the site, atleast every 20 years. 2. If notice of nonrenewal has been given, the annual fee in the tenthyear will be taken as the base, and the fee each year during the last 10-yearperiod will be one-tenth of the base multiplied by the number of yearsthen remaining on the permit. If a new 20-year permit should later be issued,the holder shall pay the United States one-half of the amount of fees foregone,for the most recent 10-year period in which the permit has been under nonrenewalnotice, by the United States while the previous permit was under a nonrenewalnotice. This amount may be paid in equal annual installments over a 10-yearperiod in addition to those fees for existing permits. Such amounts owingwill run with the property and will be charged to any subsequent purchaserof the improvements. D. Initial Fee: The initial fee may be based on an approved Forest Serviceappraisal existing at the time of this permit, with the present day valuecalculated by applying the IPD-GNP index to the intervening years. E. Payment Schedule: Based on the criteria stated herein, the initial paymentis set at $<T2>XXXXX</T2> per year and the fee is due and payable annually on <T2>XXXXXXXXXX</T2> (insert date). Payments will be credited on the datereceived by the designated collection officer or deposit location. If thedue date(s) for any of the above payments or fee calculation statementsfall on a nonworkday, the charges shall not apply until the close of businessof the next workday. Any payments not received within 30 days of the duedate shall be delinquent. F. Interest and Penalties: 1. A fee owed the United States which is delinquent will be assessed interestbased on the most current rate prescribed by the United States Departmentof Treasury Financial Manual (TFM-6-8020). Interest shall accrue on thedelinquent fee from the date the fee payment was due and shall remain fixedduring the duration of the indebtedness. 2. In addition to interest, certain processing, handling, and administrativecosts will be assessed on delinquent accounts and added to the amountsdue. 3. A penalty of 6 percent per year shall be assessed on any indebtednessowing for more than 90 days. This penalty charge will not be calculateduntil the 91st day of delinquency, but shall accrue from the date thatthe debt became delinquent. 4. When a delinquent account is partially paid or made in installments,amounts received shall be applied first to outstanding penalty and administrativecost charges, second to accrued interest, and third to outstanding principal.G. Nonpayment Constitutes Breach: Failure of the holder to make the annualpayment, late payment charge, or any other charges when due shall be groundsfor termination of this authorization. However, no permit will be terminatedfor nonpayment of any monies owed the United States unless payment of suchmonies is more than 90 days in arrears. H. Applicable Law: Delinquent fees and other charges shall be subject toall the rights and remedies afforded the United States pursuant to federallaw and implementing regulations. (31 U.S.C. 3711 <T3>et seq.</T3>). VII. Transfer, Sale, and Rental A. Nontransferability: Except as provided in this section, this permitis not transferable. B. Transferability Upon Death of the Holder: 1. If the holder of this permit is a married couple and one spouse dies,this permit will continue in force, without amendment or revision, in thename of the surviving spouse. 2. If the holder of this permit is an individual who dies during the termof this permit and there is no surviving spouse, an annual renewable permitwill be issued, upon request, to the executor or administrator of the holder'sestate. Upon settlement of the estate, a new permit incorporating currentForest Service policies and procedures will be issued for the remainderof the deceased holder's term to the eligible family member (parent(s),children, and grandchildren) as shown by an order of a court, bill of sale,or other evidence to be the owner of the improvements. C. Divestiture of Ownership: If the holder through voluntary sale, transfer,enforcement of contract, foreclosure, or other legal proceeding shall ceaseto be the owner of the physical improvements, this permit shall be terminated.If the person to whom title to said improvements is transferred is deemedby the authorizing officer to be qualified as a holder, then such personto whom title has been transferred will be granted a new permit. Such newpermit can be, at the discretion of the authorized officer, for a fullterm or for the remainder of the term of the original holder. D. Notice to Prospective Purchasers: When considering a voluntary saleof the recreation residence, the holder shall provide a copy of this specialuse permit to the prospective purchaser before finalizing the sale. Theholder cannot make binding representations to the purchasers as to whetherthe Forest Service will reauthorize the occupancy. E. Rental: The holder may rent or sublet the use of improvements coveredunder this permit only with the express written permission of the authorizedofficer. In the event of an authorized rental or sublet, the holder shallcontinue to be responsible for compliance with all conditions of this permitby persons to whom such premises may be sublet.VIII. Termination A. Termination for Cause: This permit may be terminated for cause by theauthorized officer upon breach of any of the terms and conditions of thispermit or applicable law. Prior to such termination for cause, the holdershall be given notice and provided a reasonable time_not to exceed ninety(90) days_within which to correct the breach.  B. Termination in the Public Interest During the Permit Term: 1. This permit may be revoked or terminated during its term at the discretionof the authorized officer for reasons in the public interest. (36 CFR 251.60(b).)In the event of such termination in the public interest, the holder shallbe given one hundred and eighty (180) days prior written notice to vacatethe premises, provided that the authorized officer may prescribe a datefor a shorter period in which to vacate (``prescribed vacancy date'') ifthe public interest objective reasonably requires the site in a shorterperiod of time. 2. The Forest Service and the holder agree that in the event of a terminationin the public interest, the holder shall be paid damages. Termination inthe public interest and payment of damages is subject to the availabilityof funds or appropriations. a. Damages in the event of a public interest termination shall be the lesseramount of either (1) the cost of relocation of the approved improvementsto another site which may be authorized for residential occupancy (butnot including the costs of damages incidental to the relocation which arecaused by the negligence of the holder or a third party), or (2) the replacementcosts of the approved improvements as of the date of termination. Replacementcost shall be determined by the Forest Service utilizing standard appraisalprocedures giving full consideration to the improvement's condition, remainingeconomic life and location, and shall be the estimated cost to construct,at current prices, a building with utility equivalent to the building beingappraised using modern materials and current standards, design and layoutas of the date of termination. If the holder has received notificationthat the permit will not be renewed, then the amount of damages shall beadjusted as of the date of termination by multiplying the replacement costby a fraction which has as the numerator the number of full months remainingto the term of the permit prior to termination (measured from the dateof the notice of termination) and as the denominator, the total numberof months in the original term of the permit.  b. The amount of the damages determined in accordance with paragraph a.above shall be fixed by mutual agreement between the authorized officerand the holder and shall be accepted by the holder in full satisfactionof all claims against the United States under this clause: <T3>Provided, </T3>That if mutual agreement is not reached, the authorizedofficer shall determined the amount and if the holder is dissatisfied withthe amount to be paid may appeal the determination in accordance with theAppeal Regulations (36 CFR 211.18) and the amount as determined on appealshall be final and conclusive on the parties hereto: <T3>Provided further, </T3>That upon the payment to the holder of the amountfixed by the authorized officer, the right of the Forest Service to removeor require the removal of the improvements shall not be stayed pendingfinal decision on appeal. IX Renewal  A. This permit may be renewed for another term up to 20 years in durationif the site is still being used for the purposes previously authorizedand is being continually operated and maintained in accordance with allthe provisions of the permit. In making a renewal, the authorized officermay modify the terms, conditions, and special stipulations to reflect anynew requirements imposed by current federal and state land use plans, laws,regulations, or other management decisions. (36 CFR 251.64.)  B. The authorized officer may decide to renew this authorization at anytime prior to the expiration date of this permit. Ten years prior to theexpiration date of this permit, the authorized officer will make a renewaldecision. If it is determined that the use may continue, a new 20-yearauthorization will be granted upon the holder's surrendering of the existingauthorization.  C. In the event the authorized officer decides not to renew the permit,the holder shall be notified in writing. The holder will be given at least10 years to utilize the site in the event of a decision not to nenew thepermit. To the extent that the 10 years would run beyond the expirationdate of the permit, the permit term shall be extended to accommodate the10-year notice, provided that the total tenure of the holder's occupancydoes not exceed 30 years by such extension.  D. Two years before permit expiration, the holder may request the ForestSupervisor to review the reason for nonrenewal of the permit in the lightof any change in circumstances, and the Forest Supervisor shall determinewhether or not changed circumstances warrant continuation of the use. Theauthorized officer will notify holder in a timely manner of his or herright to make such a request. Determinations under such reviews are notdecisions for purposes of the Secretary of Agriculture's administrativeappeal regulations.  E. Nonrenewal decisions based on a higher public use of the site by theForest Service will be documented by an environmental analysis which demonstratesthe higher priority use of a site for the benefit of the general public,that is timely, in public demand, and where other sites to satisfy theneed cannot reasonably be made available. X. Rights and Responsibilities Upon Termination or Nonrenewal A. Removal of Improvements Upon Termination or Nonrenewal: At the end ofthe term of occupancy authorized by this permit, or upon abandonment, ortermination for cause, Act of God, or catastrophic event, or in the publicinterest, the holder shall remove within a reasonable time all structuresand improvements except those owned by the United States, and shall returnthe site to a condition approved by the authorized officer unless otherwiseagreed to in writing or in this permit. If the holder fails to remove allsuch structures or improvements within a reasonable period_not to exceedone hundred and eighty (180) days from the date the authorization of occupancyis ended_the improvements shall become the property of the United States,but in such event, the holder remains obligated and liable for the costof their removal and the restoration of the site.  B. In case of termination or nonrenewal, except if termination is for cause,the authorized officer will make every reasonable effort to locate andreserve in-lieu sites available at that time that could be offered thepermit holder for building or relocation of improvements. Such sites willbe nonconflicting locations within the National Forest containing the residencebeing terminated or under nonrenewal or in adjacent National Forests. Anyin-lieu site offered the holder must be accepted within 90 days of theoffer or within 90 days of the final disposition of an appeal on the terminationor nonrenewal under the Secretary of Agriculture administrative appealregulations, whichever is later, or this opportunity will terminate. XI. Miscellaneous Provisions  A. This permit replaces a special use permit issued to: <ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXX</T2> on <T2>XXXXXX</T2>, 19<T2>XX</T2>. <ITAG tagnum="20">(Holder Name)   (Date)</ITAG>B. The Forest Service reserves the right to enter upon the property toinspect for compliance with the terms of this permit. Reports on inspectionfor compliance will be furnished to the holder.  C. Issuance of this permit shall not be construed as an admission by theGovernment as to the title to any improvements. The Government disclaimsany liability for the issuance of any permit in the event of disputed title. D. If there is a conflict between the foregoing standard printed clausesand any special clauses added to the permit, the standard printed clausesshall control.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Additional provisions may be added by the authorized officerto reflect local conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-18433 Filed 8-15-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-11-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>